Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.030

Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit, restrict, or apply to:

(1) Any home health or hospice agency while providing counseling to patients on placement options in the normal course of practice;

(2) Government entities providing information and assistance to vulnerable adults unless making a referral in which a fee is received from a client;

(3) Professional guardians providing services under authority of their guardianship appointment;

(4) Supportive housing or care services providers who make referrals to other supportive housing or care services providers where no monetary value is exchanged;

(5) Social workers, discharge planners, or other social services staff assisting a vulnerable adult to define supportive housing or care services providers in the course of their employment responsibilities if they do not receive any monetary value from a provider; or

(6) Any person to the extent that he or she provides information to another person.

[ 2011 c 357 s 4.]